Connecticut, session 2026, SB00243.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The chairperson of the Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority, in consultation with the Consumer
Counsel, shall conduct a study that analyzes the depiction and
description of charges on electric bills for residential electric customers.
Such study shall consider (1) whether such charges are adequately
depicted and described to inform a customer of the components of each
such charge, (2) whether moving any component of any such charge into
another charge would enhance a customer's understanding of such
component or more accurately reflect the nature of such component,
and (3) any other methods to increase transparency concerning the costs
and benefits of programs funded through such charges.
(b) If the chairperson finds that the depiction or description of any
such charge does not contain adequate information, or that any
component of any such charge should be moved into another charge,
the chairperson shall provide detailed recommendations for additional
information to increase a customer's understanding of such charge and
recommendations on how residential electric customer bills may be
redesigned. Any such recommendations concerning a residential
customer electric bill redesign may include, but need not be limited to,
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 243
the (1) renaming of any residential electric bill charge category, (2)
creation of new residential electric bill charge categories, or (3) shifting
of components of one charge into another charge. In developing any
recommendations concerning a redesign of customer electric bills
pursuant to this section, the chairperson shall solicit written comment
from each electric distribution company.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the chairperson shall submit a
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, that contains the analysis and recommendations of the
chairperson to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to energy.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
ET Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2